Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 6. Violations, Enforcement, and Penalties

§ 551.
Illegal oil, gas, and product.

The production, sale, acquisition, transportation, refining, processing, or handling of illegal oil, gas, or product is prohibited. However, no penalty shall be imposed upon a person who sells, purchases, acquires, transports, refines, processes, or handles illegal oil, gas, or product, unless that person:

knows, or is put on notice of facts indicating that illegal oil, gas, or product is involved; or

fails to obtain a certificate of clearance with respect to such oil, gas, or product if prescribed by order of the Board; or

fails to follow any other method prescribed by an order of the Board for the identification of such oil, gas, or product.

The payment of any penalty or fine shall not operate to legalize any illegal oil, gas, or product involved in the violation for which the penalty or fine is imposed, or relieve a person on whom a penalty or fine is imposed from liability to any other person for damages arising out of the violations.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 552.
Illegal oil, gas, or product declared contraband.

Illegal oil, gas, and product are declared to be contraband and are subject to seizure and sale. Seizure and sale shall be in addition to all other remedies and penalties provided in this chapter.

Whenever the Board believes that any oil, gas, or product is illegal, the Board, acting by the Attorney General, may bring a civil action in the Superior Court of the county where the oil, gas, or product is found, to seize and sell the same, or the Board may include such an action in any suit brought for an injunction or penalty. Any person claiming an interest in oil, gas, or product, affected by such an action shall have the right to intervene as an interested party.

Any person having an interest in oil, gas, or product alleged to be illegal and contesting the right of the State to seize and sell the same may obtain its release prior to sale upon furnishing a bond to the court. The bond shall be:

in an amount equal to 150 percent of the market value of the oil, gas, or product to be released;

conditioned upon either redelivery of the released commodity or payment of its market value, if and when ordered by the court; and

conditioned upon full compliance with all further orders of the court.

If the court finds that the oil, gas, or product is contraband, the court shall order its sale by the sheriff.

Upon such sale, title to the oil, gas, or product shall vest in the purchaser free of all claims, and it shall be legal oil, gas, or product in the hands of the purchaser.

All proceeds which are derived from the sale of illegal oil, gas, or product, less the costs of suit and expenses of sale, shall be paid into the General Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 553.
Disclosure of confidential information prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any member of the Board, State land manager, employee, or other person performing any function on behalf of the Board or a State land manager, or any governmental agency or employee utilizing confidential information provided to the Board, to disclose or use such information for purposes other than those authorized by the Board, except upon the written consent of the person making the information available to the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 554.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or the rules or orders of the Board shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both. In the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance may be deemed a separate offense for the purpose of the fine.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter or the rules, regulations, or orders of the Board shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or be imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

Any person who unlawfully discloses or knowingly uses for his or her own purpose information made confidential under this chapter shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of this chapter or any rule, or order of the Board, shall be subject to the same penalties prescribed for the violation of that other person.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 555.
Enforcement.

In addition to the other penalties herein provided, the Board may institute any appropriate action, injunction, or other proceeding to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of this chapter or of the rules, regulations, or orders promulgated hereunder.

If the Board fails to bring a suit or other action to enjoin a violation or threatened violation of this chapter or any rule or order of the Board within 10 days after the receipt of a written request to do so by any person who is or will be adversely affected by the violation, the person making the request may bring suit on his or her own behalf to restrain the violation or threatened violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.